New Jersey, session 221, A5934.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The Legislature finds and declares: a.  Diet-related diseases such as diabetes, heart disease, and obesity are among the leading causes of death and healthcare spending in New Jersey. b.  Approximately 1 million residents in New Jersey are food insecure, many of whom also struggle with chronic health conditions. c.  New Jersey is grappling with serious challenges stemming from widespread food insecurity, increasing rates of chronic disease, and the escalating costs associated with healthcare. d.  In 2022, 26 percent of hospitalized patients in the State had eight or more chronic conditions, highlighting the growing burden of preventable illnesses.  Compounding this issue, healthcare costs linked to food insecurity totaled over $1.3 billion in 2016, amounting to approximately $150 per resident. e.  To address the root causes of diet-related chronic diseases, promote health equity, and reduce healthcare spending, New Jersey should adopt a comprehensive Statewide program that integrates nutrition services into the healthcare system.  Evidence from states like Massachusetts and California demonstrates that medically tailored nutrition interventions can reduce hospitalizations, lower Medicaid costs, and significantly improve health outcomes. f.  Massachusetts implemented a successful statewide initiative, the Food is Medicine Massachusetts (FIMMA) program, to address the growing prevalence of diet-related chronic diseases and rising healthcare costs.  Recognizing the critical role of nutrition in preventing and managing rising health care costs and treating chronic diseases, FIMMA integrates food-based interventions directly into the healthcare system.  The program has produced positive outcomes, demonstrating that establishing similar programs could be highly effective in other states that are currently facing comparable challenges. g.  Adopting an innovative nutrition program that integrates food-based interventions directly into the States healthcare system would be a strategic move for New Jersey to enhance its overall public health and reduce healthcare costs. 2.  As used in this act: Complex chronic disease means a condition involving multiple morbidities that require the attention of multiple health care providers or facilities and, in some instances, home-based care. Covered participant means a Medicaid recipient diagnosed with a qualifying chronic illness and referred by a healthcare provider to participate in the Food is Medicine NJ Pilot Program. Food is Medicine NJ Pilot Program or program means the Food is Medicine NJ Pilot Program established pursuant to section 3 of this act. Medically tailored meal means a meal designed by a registered dietitian and prepared for a person with a specific chronic health condition. Produce prescription means a medically authorized program where eligible individuals receive funds or vouchers to purchase fresh fruits and vegetables. 3.  There is established in the Department of Human Services, in consultation with the Department of Health, the three-year Food is Medicine NJ Pilot Program. a.  The Department of Human Services shall administer the program, in consultation with the Department of Health, and in partnership with nonprofit organizations, hospitals, community health centers, and food access agencies to: (1)  deliver medically tailored meals to up to 3,000 high-risk Medicaid recipients with complex chronic conditions; and (2)  provide produce prescriptions and nutrition education to an additional 7,000 Medicaid recipients at risk of diet-related illness. b.  To be eligible for the pilot program, an individual must meet all of the following criteria: (1)  be enrolled in NJ FamilyCare; (2)  be referred to the program by a healthcare provider; and (3)  have a diagnoses of one or more of the following conditions: (a)  diabetes; (b)  heart failure; (c)  renal disease (d)  cancer; or (e)  obesity-related illness. 4.  a.  The Department of Human Services shall contract with a third-party evaluator to measure the effectiveness of the program on reductions in emergency room visits and hospitalizations, changes in medication adherence and biometric indicators such as A1C blood tests and blood pressure measurement, and overall cost savings to the Medicaid program. b.  The department shall present an interim report of its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature no later than 18 months after the enactment of this act.  A final report shall be submitted by the third year following the date of enactment. 5.  There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Human Services such sums as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act, but not to exceed $5,000,000, as shall be determined by the Commissioner of Human Services. 6.  The Commissioner of Human Services shall apply for any federal Medicaid waivers or State plan amendments as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act and ensure continued federal reimbursement for State expenditures for nutrition services under the federal Medicaid program. 7.  The Commissioner of Human Services, in consultation with the Department of Health, shall adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 8. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire upon submission of the final evaluation report unless extended by the Legislature.